Yamls/V-vovny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-11-06
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - вӧвны 'to be'/ 'olla'/ 'быть':
     вӧвны+V+Inf: вӧвны
     вӧвны+V+Inf+PxSg2: вӧвныт
     вӧвны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg2: вӧвнытӧ
     вӧвны+V+Inf+PxSg3: вӧвныс
     вӧвны+V+Inf+Acc+PxSg3: вӧвнысӧ 
     вӧвны+V+ConNeg+Pl: вӧлӧ 
     вӧвны+V+ConNeg+Sg: вӧв
     вӧвны+V+Imprt+Sg2: вӧв 
     вӧвны+V+Prec+Sg2: вӧв-ко 
     вӧвны+V+Imprt+Pl1: [вӧлам, вӧламӧ, вӧламте, вӧламӧте] 
     вӧвны+V+Prec+Pl1: [вӧлам-ко, вӧламӧ-ко] 
     вӧвны+V+Imprt+Pl2: [вӧлӧ, вӧлӧте] 
     вӧвны+V+Prec+Pl2: вӧлӧ-ко
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: вӧла
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: вӧлан
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: вӧлас
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [вӧлам, вӧламӧ]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: [вӧлат, вӧлатӧ]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: вӧласӧ
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: вӧлі
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: вӧлін
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: вӧлі
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: [вӧлім, вӧлімӧ]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: [вӧліт, вӧлітӧ]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: вӧлісӧ
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: [вӧлӧмыт, вӧлӧмат]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: [вӧлӧм, вӧлӧма]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: [вӧлӧмныт, вӧлӧмась]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: вӧлӧмась
     вӧвны+V+Inf+Comp: вӧвныжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1+Comp: вӧлажык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2+Comp: вӧланжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3+Comp: вӧласжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1+Comp: [вӧламжык, вӧламӧжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2+Comp: [вӧлатжык, вӧлатӧжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3+Comp: вӧласӧжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1+Comp: вӧліжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2+Comp: вӧлінжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Comp: вӧліжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1+Comp: [вӧлімжык, вӧлімӧжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2+Comp: [вӧлітжык, вӧлітӧжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+Comp: вӧлісӧжык
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2+Comp: [вӧлӧмытжык, вӧлӧматжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3+Comp: [вӧлӧмжык, вӧлӧмажык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2+Comp: [вӧлӧмнытжык, вӧлӧмасьжык]
     вӧвны+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3+Comp: вӧлӧмасьжык
    
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Compl: вӧлік 
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill: вӧлікӧ
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg1: вӧлікам
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg2: вӧлікат
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxSg3: вӧлікас
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl1: вӧліканым
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl2: вӧліканыт
     вӧвны+V+Der/ік+Ger+Ill+PxPl3: вӧліканыс
     вӧвны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger: вӧлӧмӧн # Ei esiinny teksteissä
     вӧвны+V+Der/ӧмӧн+Ger+Comp: вӧлӧмӧнжык # Ei esiinny teksteissä  
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger: вӧвтӧдз
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg1: [вӧвтӧдззам, вӧвтӧдззим]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg2: [вӧвтӧдззат, вӧвтӧдззит]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxSg3: [вӧвтӧдззас, вӧвтӧдззис]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl1: [вӧвтӧдззаным, вӧвтӧдззиным]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl2: [вӧвтӧдззаныт, вӧвтӧдззиныт]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧдз+Ger+PxPl3: [вӧвтӧдззаныс, вӧвтӧдззиныс]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger: вӧвтӧн
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg1: [вӧвтӧнням, вӧвтӧнним]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg2: [вӧвтӧннят, вӧвтӧннит]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxSg3: [вӧвтӧнняс, вӧвтӧннис]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl1: [вӧвтӧнняным, вӧвтӧнниным]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl2: [вӧвтӧнняныт, вӧвтӧнниныт]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧн+Ger+PxPl3: [вӧвтӧнняныс, вӧвтӧнниныс]
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger: вӧвтӧг 
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg1: вӧвтӧгьям
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg2: вӧвтӧгьят 
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxSg3: вӧвтӧгьяс
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl1: вӧвтӧгьяным
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl2: вӧвтӧгьяныт
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧг+Car+Ger+PxPl3: вӧвтӧгьяныс
     
     вӧвны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Sg: вӧлӧм
     вӧвны+V+Der/ӧм+PrfPrc+Pl: вӧлӧмӧсь
     вӧвны+V+Der/ісь+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: вӧлісь
     вӧвны+V+Der/ісь+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: вӧлісьӧсь
     вӧвны+V+Der/ан+PrsPrc+Sg: вӧлан
     вӧвны+V+Der/ан+PrsPrc+Pl: вӧланӧсь 
     вӧвны+V+Der/ана+PrsPrc+Sg: вӧлана
     вӧвны+V+Der/ана+PrsPrc+Pl: вӧланаӧсь 
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧм+PrivPrc+Sg: вӧвтӧм
     вӧвны+V+Der/тӧм+PrivPrc+Pl: вӧвтӧмӧсь
